th: วัสดุคริสตัล: อะคริลิก; แก้ว; Hardlex; Hesalite; กระจกมิเนอรัล; พลาสติก; Plexiglass; แซฟไฟร์; อื่นๆ
el: Υλικό κρυστάλλου: Ακρυλικό; Γυαλί; Hardlex; Hesalite; Ορυκτό κρύσταλλο; Πλαστικό; Plexiglass; Ζαφείρι; Άλλο
ko: 크리스털 재질: 아크릴; 유리; 하드렉스; 헤잘라이트; 미네랄 유리; 플라스틱; Plexiglass; 사파이어; 기타
pt-BR: Material do cristal: Acrílico; Vidro; Hardlex; Hesalite; Vidro mineral; Plástico; Plexiglass; Safira; Outro
tr: Cam malzemesi: Akrilik; Cam; Hardlex; Hesalite; Mineral cam; Plastik; Plexiglass; Safir; Diğer
ro-RO: Material cristal: Acrilic; Sticlă; Hardlex; Hesalit; Sticlă minerală; Plastic; Plexiglass; Safir; Altele
sv: Kristallmaterial: Akryl; Glas; Hardlex; Hesalit; Mineralglas; Plast; Plexiglass; Safir; Övrigt
sl-SI: Kristalni material: Akril; Steklo; Hardlex; Hezalit; Mineralno steklo; Plastika; Plexiglass; Safir; Drugo
nl: Horlogeglas materiaal: Acryl; Glas; Hardlex; Hesalite; Mineraalglas; Kunststof; Plexiglass; Saffier; Overig
da: Krystalmateriale: Akryl; Glas; Hardlex; Hesalit; Mineralglas; Plastik; Plexiglass; Safir; Andet
fi: Kristallimateriaali: Akryyli; Lasi; Hardlex; Hesaliitti; Mineraalilasi; Muovi; Plexiglass; Safiiri; Muu
vi: Chất liệu pha lê: Acrylic; Kính; Hardlex; Hesalite; Kính khoáng; Nhựa; Plexiglass; Sapphire; Khác
lt-LT: Kristalo medžiaga: Akrilas; Stiklas; „Hardlex“ stiklas; „Hesalite“ stiklas; Mineralinis stiklas; Plastikas; „Plexiglass“; Safyras; Kita
ja: クリスタル素材: アクリル; ガラス; ハードレックス; ヘサライト; ミネラルガラス; プラスチック; Plexiglass; サファイア; その他
es: Material del cristal: Acrílico; Vidrio; Hardlex; Hesalite; Cristal mineral; Plástico; Plexiglass; Zafiro; Otro
en: Crystal material: Acrylic; Glass; Hardlex; Hesalite; Mineral glass; Plastic; Plexiglass; Sapphire; Other
zh-CN: 晶体材料: 亚克力; 玻璃; Hardlex; Hesalite; 矿物玻璃; 塑料; Plexiglass; 蓝宝石; 其他
fr: Matériau du cristal: Acrylique; Verre; Hardlex; Hésalite; Verre minéral; Plastique; Plexiglass; Saphir; Autre
cs: Krystalový materiál: Akryl; Sklo; Hardlex; Hesalit; Minerální sklo; Plast; Plexiglass; Safír; Ostatní
hu: Kristály anyaga: Akril; Üveg; Hardlex; Hezalit; Ásványi üveg; Műanyag; Plexiglass; Zafír; Egyéb
sk-SK: Kryštálový materiál: Akryl; Sklo; Hardlex; Hesalit; Minerálne sklo; Plast; Plexiglass; Zafír; Iné
hr-HR: Kristalni materijal: Akril; Staklo; Hardlex; Hesalit; Mineralno staklo; Plastika; Plexiglass; Safir; Ostalo
pl: Materiał szkiełka: Akryl; Szkło; Hardlex; Hesalit; Szkło mineralne; Plastik; Plexiglass; Szafir; Inne
pt-PT: Material cristalino: Acrílico; Vidro; Hardlex; Hesalite; Vidro mineral; Plástico; Plexiglass; Safira; Outro
bg-BG: Кристален материал: Акрил; Стъкло; Hardlex; Хезалит; Минерално стъкло; Пластмаса; Plexiglass; Сапфир; Други
nb: Krystallmateriale: Akryl; Glass; Hardlex; Hesalitt; Mineralglass; Plast; Plexiglass; Safir; Annet
it: Materiale cristallino: Acrilico; Vetro; Hardlex; Hesalite; Vetro minerale; Plastica; Plexiglass; Zaffiro; Altro
zh-TW: 錶鏡材質: 壓克力; 玻璃; Hardlex; Hesalite 樹脂玻璃; 礦物玻璃; 塑膠; Plexiglass; 藍寶石; 其他
ru: Материал стекла часов: Акрил; Стекло; Hardlex; Хезалит; Минеральное стекло; Пластик; Plexiglass; Сапфир; Другое
de: Kristallmaterial: Acryl; Glas; Hardlex; Hesalit; Mineralglas; Kunststoff; Plexiglass; Saphir; Sonstige